District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.09

Director duties.

(a)

Directors shall cause the dissolved corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets to shareholders after payment or provision for claims.

(b)

Directors of a dissolved corporation which has disposed of claims under § 29-312.06, § 29-312.07, or § 29-312.08 shall not be liable for breach of subsection (a) of this section with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or satisfied under § 29-312.06, § 29-312.07, or § 29-312.08.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-306.32.

Section References